Wyoming, session 2025, HB0068.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 15-9-102 by creating a new subsection
(d), 15-9-103(a)(iii), (xvii), (xix)(intro) and by creating
a new paragraph (xx), 15-9-104(a)(intro), 15-9-105(a)(i),
(iii) and (b)(i), 15-9-106(a)(i) and (ii), 15-9-107,
15-9-110(a)(iv) and (b)(i)(A) through (D), 15-9-114(a),
15-9-115(a)(iii), 15-9-116(a)(ii)(intro) and (b) and
15-9-120(a)(i) are amended to read:
HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025

15-9-102. Legislative findings.

(d) It is further found and declared that there
exists in municipalities of the state a lack of affordable
housing which is injurious to the public health, safety,
morals and welfare of the residents of the state; that the
lack of affordable housing constitutes an economic and
social liability imposing onerous municipal burdens which
decrease the tax base and reduce tax revenues and
substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of
municipalities; and that the provision of affordable
housing is a matter of state policy and state concern.

15-9-103. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter, unless a different
meaning is clearly indicated by the context:

(iii) "Blighted area" means an area which by
reason of the presence of not less than two (2) conditions
for a blighted area specified in this paragraph. The
conditions for a blighted area are a substantial number of
HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025
slums, deteriorated or deteriorating structures,
predominance of defective or inadequate street layout,
faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy,
accessibility or usefulness, unsanitary or unsafe
conditions, deterioration of site or other improvements,
diversity of ownership, tax or special assessments,
delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land, defective
or unusual conditions of title, or the existence of
conditions which endanger life or property by fire and
other causes, or any combination of those factors,
substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of a
municipality, retards the provision of housing
accommodations or constitutes an economic or social
liability and is a menace to the public health, safety,
morals or welfare in its present condition and use.
However, if the blighted area consists of open land, the
conditions contained in W.S. 15-9-110(b) apply and any
disaster area referred to in W.S. 15-9-112 constitutes a
"blighted area";

(xvii) "Urban renewal area" means a slum area,
or a blighted area or a combination thereof which other
area that the local governing body designates as
HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025
appropriate for an urban renewal project as provided in
this chapter;

(xix) "Urban renewal project" includes
undertakings and activities of a municipality in one (1) or
more urban renewal areas for the provision of affordable
housing or for the elimination and for or the prevention of
the development or spread of slums and blight, and may
involve slum clearance and redevelopment in an urban
renewal area, or rehabilitation or conservation in an urban
renewal area, or any combination or part thereof in
accordance with an urban renewal plan. The undertakings
and activities may include:

(xx) "Affordable housing" means housing where
the total gross household income of the occupant does not
exceed one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the median
gross household income for the county where the housing is
located.

15-9-104. Private enterprise to be preferred; when
considered.

HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025
(a) A municipality, to the greatest extent it
determines to be feasible in carrying out the provisions of
this chapter and consistent with its needs, shall afford
maximum opportunity to the provision of affordable housing
or the development, rehabilitation or redevelopment of the
urban renewal area by private enterprise. A municipality
shall give consideration to this objective in exercising
its powers under this chapter, including the:

15-9-105. Workable program; formulation; objectives
and provisions thereof.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter a municipality
may formulate for itself a workable program for utilizing
appropriate private and public resources to:

(i) Provide affordable housing or eliminate and
prevent the development or spread of slums and urban
blight;

(iii) Provide for the development of the urban
renewal area as provided in this chapter or the
redevelopment of slum and blighted areas; or
HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025

(b) A workable program may include provisions for
the:

(i) Provision of affordable housing or the
prevention of the spread of blight through diligent
enforcement of housing, zoning and occupancy controls and
standards;

15-9-106. Initiative resolution; how adopted;
findings.

(a) No municipality shall exercise the authority
conferred upon municipalities by this chapter until the
local governing body, on its own motion or by virtue of a
petition signed by twenty-five (25) or more electors of the
municipality, has adopted a resolution finding that:

(i) There is a lack of affordable housing or
that one (1) or more slum or blighted areas exist in the
municipality; and

HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025
(ii) The rehabilitation, conservation,
development, redevelopment or a combination thereof of the
area or areas is necessary in the interest of the public
health, safety, morals or welfare of the residents of the
municipality.

15-9-107. Preliminary requirements for projects;
generally.

An urban renewal project for an urban renewal area shall
not be planned or initiated unless the governing body, by
resolution, has determined the area has a lack of
affordable housing and is appropriate for affordable
housing or has determined the area to be a slum area or a
blighted area or a combination thereof and designated it as
an urban renewal area and determined the area appropriate
for an urban renewal project under this chapter. A
municipality shall not acquire real property for any urban
renewal project unless the local governing body has
approved the urban renewal project in accordance with W.S.
15-9-110.

HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025
15-9-110. Preliminary requirements for projects;
approval by and findings of governing body.

(a) Following the hearing specified in W.S. 15-9-109,
the local governing body may approve an urban renewal
project and the plan therefor if it finds that:

(iv) The urban renewal plan affords maximum
opportunity, consistent with the municipality's needs, for
the rehabilitation, development or redevelopment of the
urban renewal area by private enterprise.

(b) If the urban renewal area consists of an area of
open land to be acquired by the municipality, the area
shall not be so acquired unless:

(i) If it is to be developed for residential
uses, the local governing body shall determine that:

(A) A shortage of housing of sound
standards and design which is affordable, decent, safe and
sanitary exists in the municipality;

HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025
(B) The There is a need for affordable
housing or that accommodations has been or will be
increased as a result of the clearance of slums in other
areas;

(C) The lack of affordable housing, the
conditions of blight in the area and or the shortage of
decent, safe and sanitary housing cause or contribute to an
increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute
a menace to the public health, safety, morals or welfare;
and

(D) The acquisition of the area for
residential uses or affordable housing is an integral part
of and essential to the program of the municipality;

15-9-114. Condemnation.

(a) A municipality has the right to acquire by
condemnation any interest in real property, including a fee
simple title thereto, which it deems necessary for or in
connection with an urban renewal project under this
chapter, provided that the right to acquire property by
HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025
eminent domain under this chapter shall not extend to
property occupied by an owner for residential purposes or
leased for current residential occupancy. A municipality
may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner now
provided or which may be hereafter provided by any other
statutory provisions. Property already devoted to a public
use may be acquired in like manner, provided that no real
property belonging to the United States, the state or any
political subdivision thereof, may be acquired without its
consent.

15-9-115. Property acquired in project; disposition
and use generally.

(a) A municipality may:

(iii) Retain the property or interest for public
use in accordance with the urban renewal plan, subject to
any covenants, conditions and restrictions, including
covenants running with the land, as it deems necessary or
desirable to assist in providing affordable housing,
preventing the development or spread of future slums or
HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025
blighted areas or to otherwise carry out the purposes of
this chapter.

15-9-116. Property acquired in project; disposition
to private persons; procedure; notice; proposals;
contracts.

(a) A municipality may:

(ii) By notice published once each week for four
(4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having a general
circulation in the community, prior to the execution of any
contract to sell, lease or otherwise transfer real property
and prior to the delivery of any instrument of conveyance
with respect thereto under the provisions of this section,
invite proposals from and make available all pertinent
information to private developers or redevelopers or any
persons interested in undertaking to develop affordable
housing or to redevelop or rehabilitate an urban renewal
area or any part thereof. The notice shall:

(b) The municipality shall consider all affordable
housing development, redevelopment or rehabilitation
HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025
proposals and the financial and legal ability of the
persons making the proposals to carry them out. The
municipality may accept any proposals it deems to be in the
public interest and in furtherance of the purposes of this
chapter. A notification of intention to accept a proposal
shall be filed with the governing body not less than thirty
(30) days prior to acceptance. Thereafter the municipality
may execute a contract and deliver deeds, leases and other
instruments and take all steps necessary to effectuate a
contract in accordance with the provisions of W.S.
15-9-115.

15-9-120. Taxes upon property; authorized division
thereof.

(a) Any urban renewal plan may contain a provision
that taxes, if any, levied upon taxable property in an
urban renewal project each year by or for the benefit of a
municipality in the state shall be divided as follows:

(i) That portion of the taxes which would be
produced by the rate upon which the tax is levied each year
by or for each of the taxing agencies upon the total sum of
HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025
the assessed value of the taxable property in the urban
renewal project as shown upon the assessment roll used in
connection with the taxation of the property by the taxing
agency, last equalized prior to the effective date of the
urban renewal project shall be allocated to and, when
collected, paid into the funds of the respective taxing
agencies as taxes by or for those taxing agencies on all
other property are paid (for the purpose of allocating
taxes by or for any taxing agency which did not include the
territory in the urban renewal project on the effective
date of the project but which territory had been annexed or
otherwise included after the effective date, the assessment
of the county last equalized on the project shall be used
in determining the assessed valuation on the taxable
property in the project on the effective date). For the
purposes of this paragraph, the assessed value of the
taxable property in an urban renewal project shall mean the
aggregate value of all property located within the
geographical boundaries of the project and notwithstanding
any of the requirements imposed under title 39, chapter 13
of Wyoming statutes, the assessed value of the taxable
property in an urban renewal project as provided under this
HB0068

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0025
paragraph shall not be modified during the term of the
project; and

Section 2. The department of revenue shall promulgate
rules necessary to implement W.S. 15-9-120(a) as amended by
this act, including any amendment of rules previously
promulgated as required by W.S. 39-13-103(b)(ii).

Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0068